Washington statutes.
RCW 18.50.115

Administration of drugs and medications—Rules.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) A midwife licensed under this chapter may obtain and administer prophylactic ophthalmic medication, postpartum oxytocic, vitamin K, Rho immune globulin (human), and local anesthetic and may administer such other drugs or medications as prescribed by a physician, an *advanced registered nurse practitioner, a naturopath, or a physician assistant acting within the practitioner's scope of practice. A pharmacist who dispenses such drugs to a licensed midwife shall not be liable for any adverse reactions caused by any method of use by the midwife.

(2) A midwife licensed under this chapter who has been granted a limited prescriptive license extension by the secretary may prescribe, obtain, and administer:

(a) Antibiotic, antiemetic, antiviral, antifungal, low-potency topical steroid, and antipruritic medications and therapies, and other medications and therapies as defined in the midwifery legend drugs and devices rule for the prevention and treatment of conditions that do not constitute a significant deviation from normal in pregnancy or postpartum; and

(b) Hormonal and nonhormonal family planning methods.

(3) A midwife licensed under this chapter who has been granted an additional license extension to include medical devices and implants by the secretary may prescribe, obtain, and administer hormonal and nonhormonal family planning medical devices, as prescribed in rule.

(4) The secretary, after collaboration with representatives of the midwifery advisory committee, the pharmacy quality assurance commission, and the Washington medical commission, may adopt rules that authorize licensed midwives to prescribe, obtain, and administer legend drugs and devices in addition to the drugs authorized in this chapter.

[2022 c 289 s 6; 2019 c 55 s 1; 2013 c 19 s 1; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 707; 1991 c 3 s 112; 1987 c 467 s 6.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.